Connecticut, session 2026, HB05034.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"broad assessment" means an assessment that measures what students
should have learned during a semester or during a school year. "Broad
assessment" does not include the state-wide mastery examinations
under section 10-14n of the general statutes or any other student
assessments required by state or federal law.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Education shall
establish, within available appropriations, an incentive program for
school districts that (1) reduces or limits the amount of time students
spend on taking broad assessments during the school year, (2) integrates
state-provided interim and formative assessment tools into the local
curriculum in a manner that supports ongoing instructional
improvement, and (3) increases teacher competency in the formative
assessment process. The incentive program may include public
LCO No. 616 1 of 3

Governor's Bill No. 5034
recognition, financial awards and enhanced autonomy or operational
flexibility for school districts.
(c) The Department of Education may accept private donations for
the purpose of this section.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than June 1, 2027, the
Department of Education shall develop and provide guidance to local
and regional boards of education on effective strategies for reducing the
amount of discretionary local student assessments. Such guidance may
include the elimination of the fall and spring administration of broad
assessments, as defined in section 1 of this act, or substituting, where
appropriate, certain end-of-unit classroom summative assessments with
state-provided interim and formative assessment tools.
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Education may,
after consultation with the working group established pursuant to
section 28 of public act 24-45, submit a request to the United States
Secretary of Education to amend the state's approved plan submitted
pursuant to the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20
USC 6301, et seq., as amended from time to time, and reauthorized by
the Every Student Succeeds Act, P.L. 114-95. Such request may include
a waiver from federal accountability requirements under said act that
allows the Department of Education to modify the state's high school
accountability model by reducing the weight assigned to the academic
achievement indicator and increasing the weight for other relevant
indicators, such as college and career-oriented measures.
Sec. 4. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Education shall redesign Connecticut's high school
mathematics pathways to prepare students for relevant postsecondary
careers. Such mathematics pathways shall include, but need not be
limited to, (1) science, technology, engineering and mathematics, (2)
data science and statistics, (3) quantitative reasoning, and (4) workforce
and applied mathematics. The commissioner may consult with relevant
LCO No. 616 2 of 3

Governor's Bill No. 5034
stakeholders to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) The commissioner, in consultation with the Connecticut Educator
Preparation and Certification Board established pursuant to section 10-
150b of the general statutes, shall develop guidelines for the role of
mathematics specialists in supporting mathematics interventions in
schools.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall (1) develop
a list of professional development providers to support the
implementation of high-quality mathematics instruction, and (2)
explore the feasibility of launching MathConn, a professional learning
series for educators. The commissioner may consult with relevant
stakeholders to implement the provisions of this subsection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 from passage New section
Sec. 4 from passage New section